Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Agricultural, Forest and Open Spaces Land

11-14-201. Expenditure of public funds.

Public funds may be expended or advanced by the state or any municipality or county in the state to acquire by purchase, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or lease, the fee or any lesser interest in land, development right, easement, covenant or other contractual right necessary to achieve the purposes of this section and §§ 11-15-107, 11-15-108, 67-5-509, 67-5-601, 67-5-602, and 67-5-1001 — 67-5-1009.

Acts 1976, ch. 782, § 12; T.C.A., § 11-1716.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Agricultural, forest and open space land, classification and assessment, title 67, ch. 5, part 10.

Agricultural resources conservation fund, § 67-4-409.

11-14-202. Public acquisition of fee.

The state or any county or municipality may also acquire the fee to any property for the purpose of conveying or leasing the property back to its original owner or other person under such covenants or other contractual arrangements as will limit the future use of the property in accordance with the purposes of this section and §§ 11-15-107, 11-15-108, 67-5-509, 67-5-601, 67-5-602, and 67-5-1001 — 67-5-1009.

Acts 1976, ch. 782, § 12; T.C.A., § 11-1716.

11-14-203. Approval by planning authority.

No private property shall be acquired by any county or municipality under this part until the planning commission having jurisdiction over the land involved, shall have, by resolution, declared such acquisition to be in the public interest.

Where no such planning commission legally exists, the Tennessee local government planning advisory committee shall exercise the same authority as where such municipal or regional commission otherwise legally exists.

Acts 1976, ch. 782, § 12; T.C.A., § 11-1716.